South Dakota, session 2026, HB1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-12A-5.1 be AMENDED:
32-12A-5.1. The state's attorney for the county in which a violation of subdivision
32-12A-5(4) occurs shall commence a civil in rem proceeding of not more than twenty
thousand five hundred and thirty-seven twenty thousand five hundred thirty-nine dollars
against the employer.
Section 2. That § 32-12A-56 be AMENDED:
32-12A-56. In addition to disqualification, a driver who is convicted of violating
an out-of-service order pursuant to § 32-12A-8.1 is subject to a civil penalty of not less
than three thousand nine hundred and sixty-one three thousand nine hundred sixty-three
dollars for a first conviction and not less than seven thousand nine hundred and twenty-
four seven thousand nine hundred twenty-six dollars for a second or subsequent
conviction.
Section 3. That § 32-12A-57 be AMENDED:
32-12A-57. The state's attorney for the county in which the violation of
subdivision 32-12A-5(3) occurs shall commence a civil in rem proceeding of not less than
seven thousand one hundred and fifty-five seven thousand one hundred fifty-seven dollars
and not more than thirty-nine thousand six hundred and fifteen thirty-nine thousand six
hundred seventeen dollars against the employer.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.